Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-220
Law library; establishment; maintenance; supervision.

The county board may, when in its discretion it shall deem it advisable, provide by purchase or otherwise for the procuring and maintaining of a suitable law library for the use of the public. Such library shall be under the supervision of the judges of the district court of the county wherein the same is located.

Laws 1911, c. 73, § 1, p. 319;

R.S.1913, § 3805;

C.S.1922, § 3198;

C.S.1929, § 51-214;

R.S.1943, § 51-220;

Laws 1961, c. 255, § 1, p. 749.